Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 5. Wyoming Energy Authority

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Authority” means the Wyoming energy authority created by W.S.

37-5-502

;

“Board” means the board of the Wyoming energy authority;

“Bonds” means notes, warrants, bonds, temporary bonds and anticipation notes issued by the authority under this article;

“Energy project” means any project related to or involving a natural resource associated with energy or an associated natural resource, including specifically geothermal and pumped hydro energy projects;

“Natural resource associated with energy” or “associated natural resource” means any technology or any substance, mineral, element or compound, either gaseous, liquid or solid, associated with the production, development, refining, processing, storage or transmission of energy or as otherwise provided in this article;

“Pipeline” means a pipeline and related facilities, including storage facilities, and including undivided ownership interests or capacity in a pipeline and related facilities, constructed for the purpose of transporting and treating natural resources associated with energy;

“Royalty in kind” means natural resources associated with energy that are received by the federal government, the state or its agencies or political subdivisions as royalties in kind under leases or otherwise;

“Critical material” means any substance used in technology or production for which there are supply risks and for which there is no readily available or accessible substitute in the United States;

“Rare earth mineral” means a metallic element of the lanthanide series of the periodic table, scandium, yttrium and any other metallic element with similar physical and chemical properties to any element specified in this paragraph.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(v) added “storage” preceding “or transmission.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "including specifically geothermal and pumped hydro energy projects" at the end of (a)(iv); in (a)(v), added "mineral," following "any substance," and "or as otherwise provided in this article" at the end; and added (a)(viii) and (a)(ix).

§ 37-5-502.
Wyoming energy authority.

Commencing July 1, 2020, there is created the Wyoming energy authority, which is a body politic and corporate operating as an instrumentality of the state of Wyoming, with authority to adopt an official seal and to sue and be sued.

The authority shall be governed by a board composed of seven (7) voting members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Except as provided in this subsection, all voting members shall be appointed for four (4) year terms. The governor shall appoint four (4) initial voting board members to a term of four (4) years and shall appoint the remaining three (3) initial voting board members to a term of two (2) years. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the governor in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

. The members shall elect from the membership a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary. A majority of the persons appointed and serving as members shall be qualified voters of the state of Wyoming. At least two (2) members of the board shall have special knowledge, education or experience in the field of energy or natural resource development, transmission, generation, transportation, financing or marketing, or a field related to industrial or municipal energy consumption. At least two (2) other members of the board shall have special knowledge, education or experience in the field of natural gas or oil production, transportation, marketing or industrial consumption. Members of the board may receive the same per diem, expenses and travel allowance as members of the legislature under W.S.

28-5-101

while in attendance at meetings of the board and while performing their duties as members of the board.

The following persons shall serve as ex officio, nonvoting members of the board:

A member of the Wyoming enhanced oil recovery institute selected by the director of the enhanced oil recovery institute;

The chief executive officer of the Wyoming business council or a designee;

The governor or a designee from his office;

The supervisor of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission or a designee;

The director of the University of Wyoming school of energy resources or, if there is no director, a member of the school of energy resources selected by the University of Wyoming energy resources council, or a designee.

The board shall meet not less than two (2) times each year with representatives of the University of Wyoming school of energy resources and the enhanced oil recovery institute to conduct its business and to consider energy related issues and the state of the energy industry in Wyoming.

Any agency, board, commission, department or institution of the state and the governing authorities of political subdivisions may make surveys, reports and investigations, and may furnish records and information and other assistance and advice as the authority may require.

Appointments and terms under this section shall be as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The authority is subject to the requirements of:

W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-105

;

W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

;

W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “At least two (2) members of the board shall have” for “Members of the board shall have” in the seventh sentence and added the eighth sentence; in the introductory language of (c) added “nonvoting” following “ex officio”; in (c)(i), substituted “institute selected by the director of the enhanced oil recovery institute” for “commission selected by the commission”; in (c)(ii) substituted “chief executive officer” for “chairman”; and in (c)(iv) substituted “supervisor” for “chairman.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 49, § 3, provides: “(a) Notwithstanding 2019 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 34, Sections 2 and 6, the board of the Wyoming energy authority established in W.S.

37-5-502

, as created by 2019 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 34, Section 2, is authorized to assemble and meet upon the effective date of this section. Before July 1, 2020, the board is authorized to meet and take actions for the following purposes:

“(i) Develop priorities and a mission statement based on the purposes and duties of the Wyoming energy authority;

“(ii) Hire staff to begin on July 1, 2020, including an executive director; “(iii)
Complete administrative tasks necessary for the Wyoming energy authority to effectively function beginning on July 1, 2020, including determining a location and securing office space for the Wyoming energy authority and its staff.

“(b) Members of the board may receive per diem, expenses and travel allowance for meetings held before July 1, 2020 as specified in W.S. 37-5-502(b), as created by 2019 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 34, Section 2.

“(c) There is appropriated fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary from the general fund to the office of the governor. This appropriation shall be expended only for the purpose of funding expenditures and Wyoming energy authority board member per diem, expenses and travel allowances incurred by the board in carrying out the actions specified in subsection (a) of this section. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2021. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2021.”

§ 37-5-503.
Purposes; report.

The authority is created to:

Diversify and expand the Wyoming economy through improvements in the state’s electric and energy transmission infrastructure and facilitate Wyoming’s production, development and transmission of energy and associated natural resources by planning, financing, constructing, developing, acquiring, maintaining and operating electric, energy export and energy transmission facilities, advanced technology facilities for natural resources associated with energy, carbon dioxide capture and transportation infrastructure, distribution facilities and related supporting infrastructure and undivided or other interests therein;

Consolidate energy staff and functions existing in the state energy program and take actions to administer the state energy program, including:

Seek federal grants and loans;

Seek to participate in applicable federal programs; and

In accordance with applicable federal program guidelines, administer federally funded state energy programs.

Assist with obtaining financing and funding for energy projects through the use or combination of bonding authority, grants, loans and private and institutional investors, and assist with the creation of new financing products;

Provide assistance with permitting, siting and other regulatory requirements;

Develop and administer programs providing education on energy resources and emerging technologies including tours, academic programs and communication plans;

Engage with international and domestic stakeholders on potential market opportunities, energy projects and technology development that will increase the value of Wyoming energy and associated natural resources;

In consultation with the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee and the governor, develop, administer, update and communicate the Wyoming energy strategy;

Plan, finance, construct, develop, acquire, maintain and operate a pipeline or other transportation and distribution systems within or outside the state of Wyoming to facilitate the production, transportation, distribution and delivery of associated natural resources that are produced or developed in this state, including energy and associated natural resources received as royalties in kind pursuant to mineral leases by the state, its agencies and political subdivisions.

Support efforts to use natural resources associated with energy for other applications and products including the use of coal for nonfuel products;

Support efforts to maintain and expand the rare earth minerals industry, the critical materials industry, the trona industry and other mineral industries in Wyoming and to maintain and expand the production of products and materials using rare earth minerals, critical materials, trona and other minerals.

In order to provide for the financing, construction, development, maintenance and operation of energy transmission facilities, pipeline and other transportation and distribution systems, the authority may own, lease or rent facilities, structures and properties, both incidental and necessary, constructed in accordance with this article and article 6 of this chapter, to facilitate the production, development, transportation, distribution and delivery of energy and associated natural resources.

Energy transmission facilities and related supporting infrastructure may include all facilities, structures and properties incidental and necessary or useful in the production, development, transportation, transmission and delivery of energy. Pipeline and other transportation or distribution systems may be inclusive of pipelines, ports, pumps, storage and all other facilities, structures and properties incidental and necessary or useful in the production, development, transportation, distribution and delivery of natural resources associated with energy to points of sale, consumption or to the points of distribution for consumption.

The authority shall establish and collect fees and prepare a schedule of fees, rentals and other charges for the use of the facilities of the authority, including capacity that the authority procures, as the board may determine.

The authority may borrow funds for the execution of the purposes of the authority, and mortgage and pledge any leases granted, assigned or subleased by the authority.

Except as provided in this section, the authority shall not exercise any of the rights or powers granted to it in this section if private persons, firms or corporations are performing the acts, constructing or have constructed the facilities or are providing the services contemplated by the authority.

Prior to exercising any rights or powers granted to it in this section except for activities related to the administration of pipeline capacity contracted with an entity operating under the jurisdiction of the federal energy regulatory commission or a successor agency, the authority shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in Wyoming, and in a newspaper in the area where the authority contemplates providing facilities or services, in the manner prescribed by law, a notice describing the acts, facilities or services contemplated by the authority. Private persons, firms or corporations wishing to perform the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services described in the notice shall have ninety (90) days from the date of last publication of the notice within which to notify the authority of their intention to perform the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services described in the notice. A person or entity giving notice to the authority shall include an anticipated timeline for completion of the acts, construction or services. In the absence of notification by a private person, firm or corporation, or if a person, firm or corporation, having given notice of intention to perform the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services contemplated by the authority, fails to commence the same within one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of last publication, the authority may proceed to perform the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services for which notice was given. A private person, firm or corporation that has made necessary applications to acquire any federal, state, local or private permits, certificates or other authorizations necessary to perform the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services included in the authority’s notice within the time required is deemed to have commenced the same. When a private person, firm or corporation has given notice of intent to perform or is performing the acts, constructing the facilities or providing the services that the authority contemplated, the authority may conduct hearings or meetings with the person, firm or corporation to assess progress toward completion of the intended acts to be performed, the facilities to be constructed or the services to be provided. If it appears to the authority that progress or completion of any or all of the intended acts may be delayed for one (1) year or more, the authority may proceed to perform the acts, construct the facilities or provide the services originally contemplated.

The authority may acquire, purchase, hold, use, lease, license, sell, transfer and dispose of an undivided or other interest in or the right to capacity in any pipeline system within or outside the state of Wyoming in order to facilitate the production, transportation, distribution or delivery of associated natural resources that are produced or developed in this state. The provisions of subsection (g) of this section shall not apply to the authority in exercising any power pursuant to this subsection.

Before any appropriation is made to the authority, the authority shall submit its budget for review as provided by W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1014

. Any appropriation to the authority shall be expended only for administrative purposes, which shall include planning and research.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(ix).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(x).

§ 37-5-504.
Powers of the authority.

The authority may:

Employ officers, agents and employees as it deems necessary for the performance of its duties and prescribe the powers and duties and fix the compensation of the officers, agents and employees;

Contract, upon terms as it may agree upon, for legal, financial, engineering and other professional services necessary or expedient in the conduct of its affairs;

Utilize the services of executive agencies of the state upon mutually agreeable terms and conditions;

Plan, finance, construct, develop, acquire, own, maintain and operate within and outside the state of Wyoming, energy transmission infrastructure, energy export facilities and pipeline and other transportation or distribution systems including pumps, storage and other attendant facilities, any necessary equipment for energy transmission infrastructure and pipeline and other transportation or distribution systems and for all other property, structures, equipment, facilities and works of public improvement necessary or useful for accomplishing the purposes for which the authority was created, including obtaining permits and acquiring rights-of-way;

Acquire by condemnation any properties necessary or useful for its purposes, provided the authority shall not have the right to condemn mineral leases, gas supplies, gas reserves, oil supplies, oil reserves, oil refineries, existing energy transmission, distribution and generation facilities, minerals, water rights, other mineral rights or pipelines or other distribution systems used in connection therewith;

Receive by gift, grant, donation or otherwise, any sum of money, aid or assistance from the United States, the state of Wyoming, any political subdivision or any other public or private entity or any country in good standing with the United States subject to federal law;

Provide light, water, communications, security and other services for its facilities as it deems advisable;

After consultation with any relevant state or federal authority, establish and charge reasonable fees, rates, tariffs or other charges for the use of all facilities administered by the authority and for all services rendered by it;

In whole or in part, operate, lease, rent and dispose of facilities, structures and properties constructed under this article. The authority shall review at least every three (3) years the feasibility of disposing of facilities it holds;

Investigate, plan, prioritize and establish corridors for the transmission of energy and natural resources associated with energy;

Enter into partnerships with public or private entities;

Conduct hearings and gather and develop relevant data consistent with the duties and powers of the authority;

Work in consultation and coordination with entities including the Wyoming business council to develop, promote and identify markets for natural resources associated with energy and facilitate supply for those markets;

Advocate for or against or take legal action concerning any energy project before any regulatory body tasked with the oversight of the project;

Request data from any public or private entity that is necessary to ascertain the location of associated natural resources within the state;

Conduct national and international marketing and technology research;

Do any and all things necessary or proper for the development, regulation and accomplishment of the purposes of the authority within the limitations of authority granted by this article.

The sole recourse of any party contracting with the authority shall be against the authority, and there shall be no cause of action against the state or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vi) added “or any country in good standing with the United States subject to federal law” at the end; in (a)(xiv) added “or take legal action concerning” following “for or against”; redesignated former (a)(xv) as (a)(xvii); and added present (a)(xv) and (a)(xvi).

§ 37-5-505.
Bonds.

In addition to the powers otherwise granted to the authority and in order to accomplish its purposes, the authority shall have the power to borrow money and evidence the borrowing in the issuance and sale of bonds or other obligations of the authority, the principal and interest of which shall be payable solely out of revenues authorized to be dedicated and pledged for the payment.

Bonds issued under this section shall be solely the obligation of the authority and shall recite on their face that they do not constitute obligations of the state of Wyoming or any county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state. The bonds or other obligations shall be authorized and issued by resolution of the authority. The bonds shall be executed in the form and manner provided by the resolution authorizing their issuance. The resolution shall include:

The series of the bond or obligation;

The date of issuance of the bond or obligation;

The date of maturity of the bond or obligation;

That the bond or obligation shall bear interest, and the interest rate;

The form that the bond or obligation shall be in;

The registration and exchangeability privileges of the bond or obligation;

The medium of payment and the place of payment of the bond or obligation;

The terms of redemption and that the bond or obligation shall be subject to those terms;

That the bond or obligation shall be entitled only to a priority on the revenues of the authority as the authority’s resolution provides, subject to subsection (d) of this section.

The bonds or other obligations issued under this section may be sold by the authority at, above or below par value, at public or private sale, in a manner and from time to time as the authority determines.

Except as provided by subsection (k) of this section, any bonds issued under this section shall be payable from and be secured by the pledge of the revenues derived from the operation of the pipeline or other transportation or distribution system or energy transmission facility as constructed, acquired, extended or improved with the proceeds of the bonds, subject only to prior payment of the reasonable and necessary expenses of operating and maintaining the system or facility. Any holder of the bonds may by appropriate legal action compel performance of all duties required of the authority in order to enforce payment of the bonds when due. If any bond issued under this section is permitted to go into default as to principal or interest, any court of competent jurisdiction may, pursuant to the application of the holder of the bonds, appoint a receiver for the system or facility, who shall operate the same and collect and distribute the revenues thereof pursuant to the provisions and requirements of the resolution authorizing the bonds.

If more than one (1) series of bonds is issued payable from the revenues of the facility or bond proceeds, priority of lien on the revenues shall be as provided by the resolution authorizing the bonds.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall constitute negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code. The bonds and income from them shall be exempt from all taxation within the state of Wyoming.

No board or commission other than the authority shall fix or supervise the making of fees and charges stated in this subsection, which shall be in amounts reasonably necessary for the purposes stated in this article. When the authority has issued bonds and pledged the revenues of the pipeline or other transportation or distribution system or facility or the energy transmission facility for the payment of the bonds as provided in this article, the authority shall operate and maintain or shall contract for the operation and maintenance of the system or facility and shall impose and collect fees and charges for the services furnished by the system or facility, including those furnished to the authority itself, in the amounts and at rates as shall be fully sufficient at all times to:

Pay the expenses of operating and maintaining the system or facility;

Provide a sinking fund sufficient to assure the prompt payment of principal and interest on the bonds as each falls due;

Provide a reasonable fund for contingencies as may be required by any bond underwriting or by the resolution authorizing the bonds; and

Provide an adequate depreciation fund for repairs, extensions and improvements to the system or facility necessary to assure adequate and efficient service to the public.

Any resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in Wyoming, and in a newspaper in the area where the facility or services are contemplated. For a period of thirty (30) days from the date of the publication any person in interest may contest the legality of the resolution and of the bonds to be issued under the resolution and the provisions securing the bonds, including the validity of any lease or other contract pledged to the payment thereof. After the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date of the publication no one shall have any right of action to contest the validity of the bonds, the validity of the security pledged to the payment thereof or the provisions of the resolution under which the bonds were issued, and all the bonds and all related proceedings shall be conclusively presumed to be legal.

The authority may authorize the issuance of bonds for the purpose of refunding, extending and unifying the whole or any part of the principal, interest and redemption premiums on any outstanding bonds issued under this article, as well as bonds issued by the Wyoming pipeline authority under W.S.

37-5-101

through

37-5-109

and by the Wyoming infrastructure authority under W.S.

37-5-301

through

37-5-307

, before July 1, 2020. The refunding bonds may either be sold and the proceeds applied to or deposited in escrow for the retirement of the outstanding bonds, or may be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds. The refunding bonds shall be authorized in all respects as original bonds are herein required or were required at the time of their issuance to be authorized. The authority, in authorizing the refunding bonds, shall provide for the security of the bonds, the sources from which the bonds are to be paid and for the rights of the holders thereof in all respects as herein provided for other bonds issued under this article. The board may also provide that the refunding bonds shall have the same or different priority of lien on the revenues pledged for their payment as was enjoyed by the bonds refunded.

The authority may authorize the issuance of bonds for the purpose of purchasing pipeline capacity as authorized by W.S. 37-5-503(h). Any bonds issued under this subsection shall be payable solely from and be secured solely by the pledge of the revenues derived from the subsequent sale, lease or other disposal of the capacity purchased or from bond proceeds. Bonds issued under this subsection shall be authorized in all respects as other bonds of the authority are required to be authorized. The authority, in authorizing the bonds, shall provide for the security of the bonds, the sources from which the bonds are to be paid and for the rights of the holders thereof.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (g) added “or shall contract for the operation and maintenance of” following “operate and maintain.”

§ 37-5-506.
Use of net revenues.

The authority, acting alone or in cooperation with any agency of the state of Wyoming, may use and employ any net revenues derived from a system or facility authorized in this article and from any other source, after providing for all costs of maintenance and operation of the system or facility and after making the required principal and interest payments on any revenue bonds issued hereunder and any other payments provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance and sale of revenue bonds and obligations, to extend and improve the system or facility as the authority may determine to be warranted by any need for additional intrastate transportation or energy transmission facilities.

Revenues derived from the issuance of bonds for the purpose of purchasing pipeline capacity as authorized under W.S. 37-5-505(k) shall be used for such purchases and to make principal and interest payments on such bonds as provided by the authority in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds.

If the authority determines that no need for additional transportation or energy transmission facilities exists and after the administrative expenses of the authority are paid, net revenues derived under this article shall be paid to the state treasurer for credit to the state general fund.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-507.
Authority not subject to the public service commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority and the authority’s fees, rates, rental and other charges shall not be subject to the supervision, regulation, control or jurisdiction of the public service commission.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-508.
Subpoena.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this article, the authority or any officer it designates may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements or other documents or records that the authority deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey, a subpoena issued to any person, a Wyoming district court, upon the authority’s application, may issue to the person an order requiring him to appear before the authority or the officer it designates. The order may require the person to produce documentary evidence or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

In considering a request by the authority under subsection (b) of this section, the district court shall review the request in camera to protect the confidentiality of the information sought. The court may also restrict disclosure of any confidential information in any other proceeding, administrative or judicial, and may order that the information be sealed.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 37-5-509.
Confidential information.

All information obtained by the authority in connection with any hearing or investigation under this article that contains or that might reveal proprietary data shall be considered as confidential for the purposes of this article. The authority shall not disclose confidential information to any person, governmental entity or agency without prior written consent from the owner of the confidential information. Any board or staff member who discloses or causes to be disclosed any confidential information is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

2019 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 34, § 6(a), makes the act effective July 1, 2020.